src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-koonjal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kõõnjâl â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Nom: kõõnjâl
     kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Gen: kõnnjâl
     kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Acc: kõnnjâl
     kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Ill: kõnnjla
     kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Loc: kõnnjlest
     kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Com: kõnnjlin
     kõõnjâl+N+Ess: kõnnjlen
     kõõnjâl+N+Par: kõnnjled
     kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Abe: [kõnnjâltaa, kõnnjâltää]
     kõõnjâl+N+Pl+Nom: kõnnjâl
     kõõnjâl+N+Pl+Gen: kõnnjli
     kõõnjâl+N+Pl+Acc: kõnnjlid
     kõõnjâl+N+Pl+Ill: kõnnjlid
     kõõnjâl+N+Pl+Loc: kõnnjlin
     kõõnjâl+N+Pl+Com: kõnnjlivuiʹm
     kõõnjâl+N+Pl+Abe: [kõnnjlitaa, kõnnjlitää]
